Maine, session 132, LD1019.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to the Town of Kittery for renovations and
maintenance to restore and preserve the Fort McClary State Historic Site in Kittery Point.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $60,000 $0